Hawaii statutes.
[PART
VI.] OUT-OF-STATE OFFICES

§201-81 Establishment of out-of-state
offices; purposes. The department of business, economic development, and
tourism may establish and operate offices in out-of-state locations, including
foreign nations, to effectuate the following purposes:

(1) Develop programs to reach targeted companies or
industries in the respective area and surrounding regions;

(2) Monitor out-of-state government policies and
regulations that have an impact on business, markets, sales, tourism, and
related activities;

(3) Host government and business officials at
conferences, meetings and social occasions, or other events on matters
pertaining to business opportunities and attraction of investments for the
State;

(4) Develop and conduct advertising efforts,
promotional events, media coverage, and educational programs regarding commerce
in the State; and

(5) Conduct related operations as needed, such as
hiring or contracting for consultants. [L 1988, c 366, pt of §1; am L 1990, c
293, §8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next